Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.410

Agency training and career development plans—Budget.

Each agency subject to the provisions of this chapter shall:

(1) Prepare an employee training and career development plan which shall at least meet minimum standards established by the department of enterprise services;

(2) Provide for training and career development for its employees in accordance with the agency plan;

(3) Budget for training and career development in accordance with procedures of the office of financial management.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 424; 2002 c 354 s 220; 1980 c 118 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Severability—1980 c 118: See note following RCW 41.06.010.